Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1302
Government, Military and Veterans
Affairs Committee; report.

(1) Every four years, beginning
in 2008, the Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee of the Legislature
shall prepare and publish a report pertaining to boards, commissions, and
similar entities created by law that are made part of or are placed in the
executive branch of state government. The committee may also include entities
created by executive order or by an agency director. The report shall be submitted electronically to the Legislature
on December 1 of such year.

(2) The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) The name of each board, commission, or similar entity;

(b) The name of a parent agency, if any;

(c) The statutory citation or other authorization for the creation of
the board, commission, or entity;

(d) The number of members of the board, commission, or entity and how
the members are appointed;

(e) The qualifications for membership on the board, commission, or entity;

(f) The number of times the board, commission, or entity is required
to meet during the year and the number of times it actually met;

(g) Budget information of the board, commission, or entity for the four
most recently completed fiscal years; and

(h) A brief summary of the accomplishments of the board, commission,
or entity for the past four years.

Laws 1999, LB 298, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 241, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 81.